Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-603
Assessments, fees, and money collected by Director of Banking and Finance; use.

The assessments referred to in sections 8-601 and 8-605, the costs charged pursuant to section 8-606, examination fees, investigation fees, filing fees, registration fees, licensing fees, and all other fees and money, except fines, collected by or paid to the Director of Banking and Finance under any of the laws specified in section 8-601, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund. Fines collected by the director under such laws shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2007, LB124, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 137;

Laws 2026, LB836, § 3.
July 18, 2026